src/kal-lex.txt
+LIR=RIIR=SIMA=LIR+vv:%>%TRUNClereersimaler	GaqP ;
+LIR=RIIR=SIMA=LIR=GALUAR+vv:%>%TRUNClereersimaleraluar	GaqP ;
+LIR=RIIR=VIP+vv:%>%TRUNCleriivip	TaqP ;
+LIR=RIIR=VIP=SIMA+vv:%>%TRUNCleriivissima	SaqP ;
+LIR=RUTTUR+vv:%>%TRUNCleruttor	GaqP ;
+LIR=RUTTUR=GALUAR+vv:%>%TRUNCleruttoraluar	GaqP ;
+LIR=SIMA+vv:%>%TRUNClersima	SaqP ;
+LIR=SIMA=NIR+vv:%>%TRUNClersimaner	GaqP ;
+LIR=SIMA=QE+vv:%>%TRUNClersima%TRUNCq	XTPX_schwa ;
+LIR=SIMA=RIAR+vv:%>%TRUNClersimariar	GaqP ;
+LIR=SIMA=SSA+vv:%>%TRUNClersimassa	flex-tvP_vaa ;
+LIR=SIMA=SSA=NIR+vv:%>%TRUNClersimassaner	GaqP ;
+LIR=SIMA=TAR+vv:%>%TRUNClersimasar	GaqP ;
+LIR=SIMA=TARE+vv:%>%TRUNClersimasar	XTPX_schwa ;
+LIR=SIMA=TIGE+vv:%>%TRUNClersimatig	XTPX_schwa ;
+LIR=SINNAA+vv:%>%TRUNClersinnaa	SaqP ;
+LIR=SINNAA=NNGIT+vv:%>%TRUNClersinnaanngi	nngisaqP ;
+LIR=SINNAA=QQU+vv:%>%TRUNClersinnaaqqu	SaqP ;
+LIR=SINNAA=QQU+vv:%>%TRUNClersinnaaqqu	flex-ivP_voq ;
+LIR=SSA+vv:%>%TRUNClissa	flex-tvP_vaa ;
+LIR=TAR+vv:%>%TRUNClersar	GaqP ;
+LIR=TARE+vv:%>%TRUNClertar	XTPX_schwa ;
+LIR=TARE+vv:%>%TRUNClersar	XTPX_schwa ;
+LIR=TARE+vv:%>%TRUNClerar	XTPX_schwa ;
+LIR=TARIAQAR+vv:%>%TRUNClersariaqar	GaqP ;
+LIR=TARIAQAR+SUB+vv:%>%TRUNClertariaqar	GaqP ;
+LIR=TIP+vv:%>%TRUNClersip	XIPX ;
+LIR=TIP+vv:%>%TRUNClersip	TaqP ;
+LIR=TIP=GUMAAR+vv:%>%TRUNClersikkumaar	XIPX ;
+LIR=TIP=GUMAAR+vv:%>%TRUNClersikkumaar	GaqP ;
+LIR=TIP=HTR+vv:%>%TRUNClersitsi	IV_voqP ;
+LIR=TIP=NIAR+vv:%>%TRUNClersinniar	GaqP ;
+LIR=TIP=NIQAR+vv:%>%TRUNClersinneqar	XIPX ;
+LIR=TIP=SINNAA+vv:%>%TRUNClersissinnaa	SaqP ;
+LIR=TUUR+vv:%>%TRUNClersoor	GaqP ;
+LIR=TUUR=TAR+vv:%>%TRUNClersoortar	GaqP ;
+LIR=TUUR=TAR=SIMA+vv:%>%TRUNClersoortarsima	SaqP ;
+LIR=VIP+vv:%>%TRUNClivip	TaqP ;
+LIR=VIP=SIMA+vv:%>%TRUNClivissima	SaqP ;
+LIR=VIP=SSA+vv:%>%TRUNClivissa	flex-tvP_vaa ;
+LIR=VIP=TARIAR=QAR+vv:%>%TRUNClivittariaqar	GaqP ;
+LIR=GASUAR+vv:%>%TRUNClerasuar	GaqP ;
+LIR=GUNAR+vv:%>%TRUNClerunar	GaqP ;
+LIR=GUNNAR+vv:%>%TRUNClerunnar	GaqP ;
+LIR=INNAR+vv:%>%TRUNCliinnar	GaqP ;
+LIR=KANNIR+vv:%>%TRUNClikanner	GaqP ;
+LIR=LLAR+vv:%>%TRUNClillar	GaqP ;
+LIR=LLUINNAR+vv:%>%TRUNClerluinnar	GaqP ;
+LIR=MISAAR+vv:%>%TRUNClimisaar	GaqP ;
+LIR=NGAJAP=TUUR=GALUAR+vv:%>%TRUNClingajattooraluar	GaqP ;
+LIR=NIKUU+vv:%>%TRUNClernikuu	SaqP ;
+LIR=NNGUATSIAR+vv:%>%TRUNClinnguatsiar	GaqP ;
+LIR=PAJAAR+vv:%>%TRUNClipajaar	GaqP ;
+LIR=PALUP+vv:%>%TRUNClerpalup	TaqP ;
+LIR=PASIP+vv:%>%TRUNClerpasip	TaqP ;
+LIR=QQAJAA+vv:%>%TRUNCleqqajaa	SaqP ;
+LIR=QQAAR+vv:%>%TRUNCleqqaar	GaqP ;
+LIR=QQIP+vv:%>%TRUNCleqqip	TaqP ;
+LIR=SINNAR+vv:%>%TRUNClersinnar	GaqP ;
+LIR=SSA+vv:%>%TRUNClissa	flex-tvP_vaa ;
+LIRTUR+vv:%>%TRUNClertor	GaqP ;
+LIRTUR=PALLAP=GALUAR+vv:%>%TRUNClertupallakkaluar	GaqP ;
+LIRTUR=QQIP+vv:%>%TRUNClertoqqip	TaqP ;
+LIRTUR=SIMA+vv:%>%TRUNClertorsima	SaqP ;
+LIRTUR=TAR+vv:%>%TRUNClertortar	GaqP ;
+LIRTUR=TIP+vv:%>%TRUNClertortip	TaqP ;
+LIRTUR=TIP+vv:%>%TRUNClertortip	TaqP ;
+LIRTUR=TIP=QE+vv:%>%TRUNClertorte%TRUNCq	SaqP ;
+LLAARE+vv:%>%TRUNCllaar	XTPX_schwa ;
+LLAP+vv:%>%TRUNCllap	TaqP ;
+LLAP=QQU+vv:%>%TRUNCllaqqu	SaqP ;
+LLAP=QQU=LAAR+vv:%>%TRUNCllaqqulaar	GaqP ;
+LLAP=QQU=LAAR=SINNAA+vv:%>%TRUNCllaqqulaarsinnaa	SaqP ;
+LLAP=QQU=LAAR=SINNAA=NNGIT+vv:%>%TRUNCllaqqulaarsinnaanngi	nngisaqP ;
+LLAP=TIGE+vv:%>%TRUNCllatig	XTPX_schwa ;
+LLAP=TIGE=RUSAAR+vv:%>%TRUNCllatigerusaar	GaqP ;
+LLAP=TIGE=RUSAAR=RIIR+vv:%>%TRUNCllatigerusaareer	GaqP ;
+LLAR+vv:%>%TRUNCllar	GaqP ;
+LLAR=SSA+vv:%>%TRUNCllassa	flex-tvP_vaa ;
+LLAR=TSIAR+vv:%>%TRUNCllatsiar	GaqP ;
+LLAR=TSIAR=INNAR+vv:%>%TRUNCllatsiaannar	GaqP ;
+LLATTAAR+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaar	GaqP ;
+LLATTAAR=INNAR+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaaginnar	GaqP ;
+LLATTAAR=LIR+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaaler	GaqP ;
+LLATTAAR=LIR=RIAR+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaaleriar	GaqP ;
+LLATTAAR=NIRU+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaarneru	SaqP ;
+LLATTAAR=NIRU=LIR+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaarneruler	GaqP ;
+LLATTAAR=TAR+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaartar	GaqP ;
+LLATTAAR=TAR+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaasar	GaqP ;
+LLATTAAR=TAR=LIR+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaartaler	GaqP ;
+LLATTAAR=TAR=LIR+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaasaler	GaqP ;
+LLATTAAR=TIGE+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaartig	XTPX_schwa ;
+LLATTAAR=TIGE=LIR+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaartigiler	GaqP ;
+LLATTAAR=UTIGE+vv:%>%TRUNCllattaajutig	XTPX_schwa ;
+LLATUAR+vv:%>%TRUNCllatuar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR+vv:%>luar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=INNAR+vv:%>luaannar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=LAAR+vv:%>lualaar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=LIR+vv:%>lualer	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=LIR=RIIR=QQU=GALUAR+vv:%>lualereeqqugaluar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=LIR=RUTTUR+vv:%>lualeruttor	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=NAR+vv:%>luarnar	XIPX ;
+LLUAR=NIQAR+vv:%>luarneqar	XIPX ;
+LLUAR=NIQAR=GUMAAR+vv:%>luarneqarumaar	XIPX ;
+LLUAR=NIAR+vv:%>luarniar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=NIRLUP+vv:%>luarnerlup	TaqP ;
+LLUAR=NIRU+vv:%>luarneru	SaqP ;
+LLUAR=NIRU=LIR+vv:%>luarneruler	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=NNGIT+vv:%>luanngi	nngisaqP ;
+LLUAR=NNGIT=QE+vv:%>luannge%TRUNCq	XTPX_schwa ;
+LLUAR=QATTAAR+vv:%>luaqattaar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=QATTAAR=LIR+vv:%>luaqattaaler	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=RIAR+vv:%>luariar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=SIMA+vv:%>luarsima	SaqP ;
+LLUAR=SIMA=NNGIT+vv:%>luarsimanngi	nngisaqP ;
+LLUAR=SIMA=QE+vv:%>luarsima%TRUNCq	XTPX_schwa ;
+LLUAR=SINNAA+vv:%>luarsinnaa	SaqP ;
+LLUAR=SINNAA=GUNNAIR+vv:%>luarsinnaajunnaar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=SINNAA=LIR+vv:%>luarsinnaaler	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=SINNAA=LIR=SIMA+vv:%>luarsinnaalersima	SaqP ;
+LLUAR=SINNAA=NIQAR+vv:%>luarsinnaaneqar	XIPX ;
+LLUAR=SINNAA=NIQAR=PASIP+vv:%>luarsinnaaneqarpasip	XIiPX ;
+LLUAR=SINNAA=NNGIT+vv:%>luarsinnaanngi	nngisaq ;
+LLUAR=SINNAA=SIMA+vv:%>luarsinnaasima	Saq ;
+LLUAR=SINNAA=SIMA=GALUAR+vv:%>luarsinnaasimagaluar	Gaq ;
+LLUAR=SSA+vv:%>luassa	flex-tvP_vaa ;
+LLUAR=TAR+vv:%>luartar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=TARIAQAR+vv:%>luartariaqar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=TARIAQAR=TAR+vv:%>luartariaqartar	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=TIGE+vv:%>luartig	XTPX_schwa ;
+LLUAR=TIP+vv:%>luartip	TaqP ;
+LLUAR=TIP=RIIR+vv:%>luartereer	GaqP ;
+LLUAR=VIP+vv:%>luavip	TaqP ;
+LLUINNAR+vv:%>luinnar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=GALUAR+vv:%>luinnaraluar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=GUMA+vv:%>luinnaruma	SaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=GUMAAR+vv:%>luinnarumaar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=GUNAR+vv:%>luinnarunar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=GUSUP=GALUAR+vv:%>luinnarusukkaluar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=LIR+vv:%>luinnaler	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=LIR=QQA+vv:%>luinnaleqqa	SaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=LIR=SIMA+vv:%>luinnalersima	SaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=LIR=TIP+vv:%>luinnalersip	TaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=NIKUU+vv:%>luinnarnikuu	SaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=NIKUU=GALUAR+vv:%>luinnarnikuugaluar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=NIKUU=NNGUATSIAR+vv:%>luinnarnikuunnguatsiar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=NIKUU=NNGIT+vv:%>luinnarnikuunngi	nngisaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=NIKUU=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>luinnarnikuunngikkaluar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=NIKUU=NNGIT=NGAJAP+vv:%>luinnarnikuunngingajap	TaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=NIKUU=NNGIT=NIR+vv:%>luinnarnikuunnginner	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=NIKUU=NNGIT=NNGUATSIAR+vv:%>luinnarnikuunnginnguatsiar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=RIIR+vv:%>luinnareer	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SIMA+vv:%>luinnarsima	SaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SIMA=GALUAR+vv:%>luinnarsimagaluar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SIMA=GUNAR+vv:%>luinnarsimagunar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SIMA=SSA+vv:%>luinnarsimassa	flex-tvP_vaa ;
+LLUINNAR=SSA+vv:%>luinnassa	flex-tvP_vaa ;
+LLUINNAR=SSA=GALUAR+vv:%>luinnassagaluar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SSA=GUNAR+vv:%>luinnassagunar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SSA=NGA=NAR+vv:%>luinnassanganar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SSA=NGA=NAR=NIRU+vv:%>luinnassanganarneru	SaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SSA=NGA=NAR=NIRU=TAR+vv:%>luinnassanganarnerusar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SSA=NGA=NAR=NNGIT+vv:%>luinnassangananngi	nngisaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SSA=NGA=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>luinnassanganngikkaluar	GaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SSA=NGA=TIP+vv:%>luinnassangatip	TaqP ;
+LLUINNAR=SSA=NGA=TIP=NIQAR+vv:%>luinnassangatinneqar	XIPX ;
+LLUINNAR=TAR+vv:%>luinnartar	GaqP	 ;
+LUUR+vv:%>%TRUNCloor	GaqP ;
+LUUR=TAR+vv:%>%TRUNCloortar	GaqP ;
+LUUR=TAR=GALUAR+vv:%>%TRUNCloortaraluar	GaqP ;
+LUUR=TAR=SIMA+vv:%>%TRUNCloortarsima	SaqP ;
+LUUR=TAR=SIMA=GALUAR+vv:%>%TRUNCloortarsimagaluar	GaqP ;
+MISAAR+vv:%>%TRUNCmisaar	GaqP ;
+MISAAR=NIQAR+vv:%>%TRUNCmisaarneqar	XIPX ;
+MISAAR=NIQAR=SIMA+vv:%>%TRUNCmisaarneqarsima	flex-ivP_voq ;
+MISAAR=NIQAR=SIMA=GALUAR+vv:%>%TRUNCmisaarneqarsimagaluar	XIPX ;
+MISAAR=SIMA+vv:%>%TRUNCmisaarsima	SaqP ;
+MISAAR=SIMA=SSA+vv:%>%TRUNCmisaarsimassa	flex-tvP_vaa ;
+MISAAR=SIMA=SSA=GALUAR+vv:%>%TRUNCmisaarsimassagaluar	GaqP ;
+MISAAR=TTUINNAR+vv:%>%TRUNCmisaartuinnar	GaqP ;
+MISAAR=TTUINNAR=VIP+vv:%>%TRUNCmisaartuinnavip	TaqP ;
+MMIRSUR+vv:%>%TRUNCmmersor	GaqP ;
+MMIRSUR=RIAR+vv:%>%TRUNCmmersoriar	GaqP ;
+MMIRSUR=RIIR=GALUAR+vv:%>%TRUNCmmersoreeraluar	GaqP ;
+NAR+vv:%>nar	XIPX ;
+NAR=GALUAR+vv:%>naraluar	XIPX ;
+NAR=GUNAR+vv:%>narunar	XIPX ;
+NAR=GUNAR=QE+vv:%>naruna%TRUNCq	XIPX_schwa ;
+NAR=GUNNAIR+vv:%>narunnaar	XIiPX ;
+NAR=NGAJAP+vv:%>nangajap	XIPX ;
+NAR=NGAJAP=LLUINNAR+vv:%>nangalluinnar	XIPX ;
+NAR=NGAJAP=LLUINNAR=GUNAR+vv:%>nangajalluinnarunar	XIPX ;
+NAR=NGAJAP=LLUINNAR=LIR+vv:%>nangajaplluinnaler	XIiPX ;
+NAR=NGAJAP=LLUINNAR=LIR=SIMA+vv:%>nangajalluinnalersima	flex-ivP_voq ;
+NAR=NGAJAP=LLUINNAR=SIMA+vv:%>nangajalluinnarsima	flex-ivP_voq ;
+NAR=NGAJAP=LLUINNAR=SIMA=GALUAR+vv:%>nangajalluinnarsimagaluar	XIPX ;
+NAR=NGAJAP=LLUINNAR=SIMA=GUNAR+vv:%>nangajalluinnarsimagunar	XIPX ;
+NAR=NGAJAP=LLUINNAR=SIMA=SSA+vv:%>nangajalluinnarsimassa	XIPX_ssa ;
+NAR=NIRAR+vv:%>narnerar	GaqP ;
+NAR=NIRAR=GALUAR+vv:%>narneraraluar	GaqP ;
+NAR=NIRAR=LLUINNAR+vv:%>narnerarluinnar	GaqP ;
+NAR=NIRAR=LLUINNAR=SIMA+vv:%>narnerarluinnarsima	SaqP ;
+NAR=NIRAR=SIMA+vv:%>narnerarsima	SaqP ;
+NAR=NIRAR=SIMA=GALUAR+vv:%>narnerarsimagaluar	GaqP ;
+NAR=NIRAR=SSA+vv:%>narnerassa	flex-tvP_vaa ;
+NAR=NIRAR=SSA=NIR+vv:%>narnerassaner	XTPX ;
+NAR=NIRAR=TAR+vv:%>narnerartar	GaqP ;
+NAR=NIRAR=TAR=GALUAR+vv:%>narnerartaraluar	GaqP ;
+NAR=NNGIT+vv:%>nanngi	XIPX_nngit ;
+NAR=NNGIT=LLUINNAR+vv:%>nanngilluinnar	XIPX ;
+NAR=NNGIT=LLUINNAR=GUNAR+vv:%>nanngilluinnarunar	XIPX ;
+NAR=NNGIT=LLUINNAR=SIMA+vv:%>nanngilluinnarsima	flex-ivP_voq ;
+NAR=NNGIT=LLUINNAR=SSA+vv:%>nanngilluinnassa	XIPX_ssa ;
+NAR=NNGIT=NAAR+vv:%>nannginaar	GaqP ;
+NAR=NNGIT=NAAR=VIP+vv:%>nannginaavip	TaqP ;
+NAR=NNGIT=NIRU+vv:%>nannginneru	flex-ivP_voq ;
+NAR=NNGIT=NIRU=TIP+vv:%>nannginnerutip	TaqP ;
+NAR=NNGIT=SURE+vv:%>nanngitsor	XTPX_schwa ;
+NAR=NNGIT=VIP+vv:%>nanngivip	XIiPX ;
+NAR=SI+vv:%>narsi	flex-ivP_voq ;
+NAR=SI=TIP+vv:%>narsitip	TaqP ;
+NAR=SINNAA+vv:%>narsinnaa	flex-ivP_voq ;
+NAR=SINNAA=GALUAR+vv:%>narsinnaagaluar	XIPX ;
+NAR=SSA+vv:%>nassa	XIPX_ssa ;
+NAR=SSA=NNGIT+vv:%>nassanngi	XIPX_nngit ;
+NAR=SSA=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>nassanngikkaluar	XIPX ;
+NAR=SSA=QE+vv:%>nassa%TRUNCq	XIPX_schwa ;
+NAR=KULUP+vv:%>nakulup	XIPX ;
+NAR=KULUP=QE+vv:%>nakulo%TRUNCq	XIPX_schwa ;
+NAR=LLUINNAR+vv:%>narluinnar	XIPX ;
+NAR=LLUINNAR=SIMA+vv:%>narluinnarsima	flex-ivP_voq ;
+NAR=LLUAR+vv:%>narluar	XIPX ;
+NAR=NIRU+vv:%>narneru	flex-ivP_voq ;
+NAR=NIRU=TAR+vv:%>narnerusar	XIPX ;
+NAR=NNGIT+vv:%>nanngi	XIPX_nngit ;
+NAR=QE+vv:%>na%TRUNCq	XIPX_schwa ;
+NAR=TAAR+vv:%>narsaar	GaqP ;
+NAR=TAAR=SIMA+vv:%>narsaarsima	SaqP ;
+NAR=TAAR=VALLAAR+vv:%>narsaarpallaar	GaqP ;
+NAR=TAAR=VALLAAR=GUNAR+vv:%>narsaarpallaarunar	GaqP ;
+NAR=TAAR=VALLAAR=SIMA+vv:%>narsaarpallaarsima	SaqP ;
+NAR=TAAR=VALLAAR=SIMA=GUNAR+vv:%>narsaarpallaarsima	SaqP ;
+NAR=TIP+vv:%>nartip	TaqP ;
+NAR=TIP+vv:%>nartip	XIPX ;
+NAR=TIP=NIQAR=GUNNAR=NNGIT+vv:%>nartinneqarunnanngi	XIPX_nngit ;
+NAR=TIP=NNGIT+vv:%>nartinngi	XIPX_nngit ;
+NAR=TIP=NNGIT=NIR+vv:%>nartinnginner	XIiPX_fleksiver ;
+NAR=VALLAAR+vv:%>narpallaar	XIPX ;
+NAR=VALLAAR=NNGIT+vv:%>narpallaanngi	XIPX_nngit ;
+NAR=VALLAAR=SSA+vv:%>narpallaassa	XIPX_ssa ;
+NAR=VALLAAR=SSA=NNGIT+vv:%>narpallaassanngi	XIPX_nngit ;
+NAR=VALLAAR=SIMA+vv:%>narpallaarsima	flex-ivP_voq ;
+NAR=VALLAAR=SIMA=NNGIT+vv:%>narpallaarsimanngi	XIPX_nngit ;
+NAR=VALLAAR=SIMA=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>narpallaarsimanngikkaluar	XIPX ;
+NAVIAR+vv:%>naviar	GaqP ;
+NAVIAR=NNGIT+vv:%>navianngi	nngisaqP ;
+NAVIAR=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>navianngikkaluar	GaqP ;
+NAVIIR+vv:%>naveer	XIiPX ;
+NAVIIR=QQA+vv:%>naveeqqa	SaqP ;
+NAVIIR=QQU+vv:%>naveeqqu	SaqP ;
+NAVIIR=SSAAR+vv:%>naveersaar	GaqP ;
+NAVIIR=SSAAR=GALUAR+vv:%>naveersaaraluar	GaqP ;
+NAVIIR=SSAAR=INNAR=NIAR+vv:%>naveersaaginnarniar	GaqP ;
+NAVIIR=SSAAR=NIAR+vv:%>naveersaarniar	GaqP ;
+NAVIIR=SSAAR=NIAR=SSA+vv:%>naveersaarniassa	flex-tvP_vaa ;
